Utah statutes.
26-10-2.5.   Creation of fund -- Fund money -- Use for maternal and child nutrition program.

(1) (a)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) Supplemental Food Program Fund."

(b)  As used in this section, "fund" means the fund created in this Subsection (1).

(2)  All grant money of $450,000 received by the Division of Community and Family Health Services created in Title 26, Chapter 10, from infant formula companies, for the purpose of promoting the health of women, infants, and children by assuring they have opportunities for access to good nutrition, shall be deposited in this fund.

(3)  Money in the fund may be used only:

(a)  for the department's special supplemental food program for women, infants, and children; and

(b)  upon joint agreement of the department and the State WIC Advisory Council established by the department.

(4)  The fund shall be incorporated into the department WIC plan.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2002 General Session

